Utah statutes.
17-16a-10.   Violation a misdemeanor -- Removal from office.
In addition to any penalty contained in any other provision of law, any person
who knowingly and intentionally violates this part is guilty of a class A
misdemeanor and shall be dismissed from employment or removed from office.
